Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [471.3435] NONDISCLOSURE AGREEMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "municipality" means a county, home rule charter or statutory city, town, school district, housing and redevelopment authority, economic development authority, port authority, or any other political subdivision of the state with authority to enter into a contract for the use of real property and includes any person acting in their capacity as an employee, elected official, appointed official, or other representative of a municipality. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Nondisclosure agreements restricted. new text end new text begin (a) A municipality must not enter into a nondisclosure agreement or other contract with a private person restricting the municipality from disclosing information to members of the public about the development of land, an economic development project or program, or a project or program financed in whole or in part with the municipality's tax revenues, financial obligations, or taxing powers, including proposed tax increment financing districts, economic development abatements, and municipal bonds or other debt obligations, except as required by state or federal law. new text end new text begin (b) Any agreement or contract, or term of an agreement or contract, that violates paragraph (a) is void and unenforceable. new text end new text begin (c) If a contract contains a provision that is void and unenforceable under paragraph (b), the provision must be severed from the other provisions of the contract to the extent that the provision is void and unenforceable. The fact that the provision is void and unenforceable does not affect the other provisions of the contract. new text end new text begin (d) A municipality must publicly disclose any contract or agreement that the municipality has entered into that violates paragraph (a). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end